Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB532.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3356. Private parking lots.(a) Authorization .--The owner or operator of a private parking lot or the private parking lot's agents may establish rules and rates that govern the parking of vehicles on the private property. Rules and rates may include fees or charges for violating the property owner's or operator's rules.(b) Signage.--The owner or operator of a private parking lot or the private parking lot's agents shall place signage that is legible and clearly visible to individuals entering the area of the parking lot. The signage must state that the property is not operated by a governmental entity and list the rates for parking 123456789101112131415161718 charges and for fees for violating the rules of the property owner or operator.(c) Invoices.--Any invoice for unpaid parking charges and fees for violating the rules of the property owner or operator of a private property used for vehicle parking must be placed on the vehicle in a prominent location or mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within 10 business days of the violation.(d) Limited informational access.--(1) An owner or operator of a private parking lot or the private parking lot's agents may, upon the filing of an affidavit certifying the intended use of records and the execution of a contract in a form and manner prescribed by the department, obtain records from the department limited to the name and mailing address of a registration plate issued under section 1331 (relating to issuance and reissuance of registration plates).(2) The affidavit of intended use and contract executed between the private parking lot owner or operator or the private parking lot agent and the department shall specify that access to records shall be solely for the purpose of obtaining the name and mailing address of the registrant of a vehicle which has parked an unattended vehicle on the private property of the private parking lot for the purpose of mailing the registrant an invoice for unpaid parking charges and fees for violating the rules of the property owner or operator of a private property.(3) Private parking lot owners or operators or the private parking lot's agent in compliance with this section shall obtain the records via mass record interrogation via computer access.20250SB0532PN0517 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Access to registered motor vehicle owner information by a private parking lot owner or operator or the private parking lot's agents shall not be considered a sale, publication or disclosure of a driving record under section 6114(a) (relating to limitation on sale, publication and disclosure of records) and shall be considered a permissible use authorized under 18 U.S.C. § 2721(b)(14) (relating to prohibition on release and use of certain personal information from State motor vehicle records).(e) Fees.--The department may charge a reasonable fee for each record request . The following shall apply to the fee for each record request:(1) The fee may not exceed $1 in 2025 and 2026. (2) The department shall have the following duties regarding the fee:(i) D etermine the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the period beginning January 1, 2026, and ending December 31, 2027.(ii) Apply, as of July 1, 2027, the increase calculated under subparagraph (i) to the fee.(iii) Determine t he percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for each subsequent 12-month period and apply the increase calculated under this subparagraph to the fee.(3) The department shall round the adjustments to the fee under paragraph (2) to the nearest multiple of $1.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250SB0532PN0517 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Agent." An individual or entity designated in writing by the owner or operator of a private parking lot to carry out some or all of the duties detailed in this section."Private parking lot." The term shall mean the same as under section 3353(b)(2) (relating to prohibitions in specified places).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0532PN0517 - 4 - 1234567